District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.37

Marina standards.

New or existing marinas within the Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone shall comply with the program elements outlined in the Clean Marina Guidebook issued by the National Park Service. The owner or applicant for the marina shall submit a copy of its Clean Marina Checklist and any supporting documentation to the DDOE.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 457, 55 DCR 1689